Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.060

Stolen metal property—Preserving evidence. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) Following notification in writing from a commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions that an item of private metal property, nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property has been reported as stolen, a scrap metal business shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling, and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the property. The scrap metal business shall hold the property for a period of time as directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up to a maximum of ten business days.

(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of private metal property, nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property unless that law enforcement agency reasonably suspects that the property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on the property must be removed within ten business days after the property on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost and the property must be returned to the owner or released.

[ 2013 c 322 s 9; 2008 c 233 s 6; 2007 c 377 s 6.]

PDFRCW 19.290.060

Stolen metal property—Preserving evidence. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) Following notification in writing from a commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions that an item of nonferrous metal property or commercial metal property has been reported as stolen, a scrap metal business shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling, and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the property. The scrap metal business shall hold the property for a period of time as directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up to a maximum of ten business days.

(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of nonferrous metal property or commercial metal property unless that law enforcement agency reasonably suspects that the property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on the property must be removed within ten business days after the property on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost and the property must be returned to the owner or released.

[ 2024 c 301 s 8; 2013 c 322 s 9; 2008 c 233 s 6; 2007 c 377 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.